Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.070

General authority peace officer—Powers of, circumstances.

In addition to any other powers vested by law, a general authority Washington peace officer who possesses a certificate of basic law enforcement training or a certificate of equivalency or has been exempted from the requirement therefor by the Washington state criminal justice training commission may enforce the traffic or criminal laws of this state throughout the territorial bounds of this state, under the following enumerated circumstances:

(1) Upon the prior written consent of the sheriff or chief of police in whose primary territorial jurisdiction the exercise of the powers occurs;

(2) In response to an emergency involving an immediate threat to human life or property;

(3) In response to a request for assistance pursuant to a mutual law enforcement assistance agreement with the agency of primary territorial jurisdiction or in response to the request of a peace officer with enforcement authority;

(4) When the officer is transporting a prisoner;

(5) When the officer is executing an arrest warrant or search warrant; or

(6) When the officer is in fresh pursuit, as defined in RCW 10.93.120.

[ 1985 c 89 s 7.]